Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4095.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62U.04, subdivision 13, is amended to read: Subd. 13. Expanded access to and use of the all-payer claims data. (a) The commissioner or the commissioner's designee shall make the data submitted under subdivisions 4, 5, 5a, and 5b, including data classified as private or nonpublic, available to individuals and organizations engaged in research on, or efforts to effect transformation in, health care outcomes, access, quality, disparities, or spending, provided the use of the data serves a public benefitnew text begin , and for the commissioner of commerce, subject to the data use provisions in subdivision 11, paragraph (b), to fulfill health insurance oversight dutiesnew text end . Data made available under this subdivision may not be used to: (1) create an unfair market advantage for any participant in the health care market in Minnesota, including health plan companies, payers, and providers; (2) reidentify or attempt to reidentify an individual in the data; or (3) publicly report contract details between a health plan company and provider and derived from the data. (b) To implement paragraph (a), the commissioner shall: (1) establish detailed requirements for data access; a process for data users to apply to access and use the data; legally enforceable data use agreements to which data users must consent; a clear and robust oversight process for data access and use, including a data management plan, that ensures compliance with state and federal data privacy laws; agreements for state agencies and the University of Minnesota to ensure proper and efficient use and security of data; and technical assistance for users of the data and for stakeholders; (2) develop a fee schedule to support the cost of expanded access to and use of the data, provided the fees charged under the schedule do not create a barrier to access or use for those most affected by disparities; and (3) create a research advisory group to advise the commissioner on applications for data use under this subdivision, including an examination of the rigor of the research approach, the technical capabilities of the proposed user, and the ability of the proposed user to successfully safeguard the data. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62W.06, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Intra-governmental data sharing. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding subdivision 2, paragraph (d), the commissioner shall provide the data collected under subdivision 2, paragraph (a), to the commissioner of health. new text end